Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2550
Liberal construction.

The Joint Public Agency Act is necessary for the welfare of the state and its inhabitants and shall be construed liberally to effect its purposes.

Laws 1999, LB 87, § 50.